Missouri, session 2026, SB1785.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 544.455, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 544.455,
to read as follows:
544.455. 1. Any person charged with a bailable
offense, at his or her appearance before an associate
circuit judge or judge may be ordered released pending
trial, appeal, or other stage of the proceedings against him
on his personal recognizance, unless the associate circuit
judge or judge determines, in the exercise of his
discretion, that such a release will not reasonably assure
the appearance of the person as required. When such a
determination is made, the associate circuit judge or judge
may either in lieu of or in addition to the above methods of
release, impose any or any combination of the following
conditions of release which will reasonably assure the
appearance of the person for trial:
(1) Place the person in the custody of a designated
person or organization agreeing to supervise him;
(2) Place restriction on the travel, association, or
place of abode of the person during the period of release;

SB 1785 2
(3) Require the execution of a bail bond with
sufficient solvent sureties, or the deposit of cash in lieu
thereof;
(4) Require the person to report regularly to some
officer of the court, or peace officer, in such manner as
the associate circuit judge or judge directs;
(5) Require the execution of a bond in a given sum and
the deposit in the registry of the court of ten percent, or
such lesser percent as the judge directs, of the sum in cash
or negotiable bonds of the United States or of the state of
Missouri or any political subdivision thereof;
(6) Place the person on house arrest with electronic
monitoring; except that all costs associated with the
electronic monitoring shall be charged to the person on
house arrest. If the judge finds the person unable to
afford the costs associated with electronic monitoring, the
judge may order that the person be placed on house arrest
with electronic monitoring if the county commission agrees
to pay from the general revenue of the county the costs of
such monitoring. If the person on house arrest is unable to
afford the costs associated with electronic monitoring and
the county commission does not agree to pay the costs of
such electronic monitoring, the judge shall not order that
the person be placed on house arrest with electronic
monitoring;
(7) Impose any other condition deemed reasonably
necessary to assure appearance as required, including a
condition requiring that the person return to custody after
specified hours.
2. In determining which conditions of release will
reasonably assure appearance, the associate circuit judge or
judge shall, on the basis of available information, take

SB 1785 3
into account the nature and circumstances of the offense
charged, the weight of the evidence against the accused, the
accused's family ties, employment, financial resources,
character and mental condition, the length of his residence
in the community, his record of convictions, and his record
of appearance at court proceedings or flight to avoid
prosecution or failure to appear at court proceedings.
3. An associate circuit judge or judge authorizing the
release of a person under this section shall issue an
appropriate order containing a statement of the conditions
imposed, if any, shall inform such person of the penalties
applicable to violations of the conditions of his release
and shall advise him that a warrant for his arrest will be
issued immediately upon any such violation.
4. A person for whom conditions of release are imposed
and who after twenty-four hours from the time of the release
hearing continues to be detained as a result of his
inability to meet the conditions of release, shall, upon
application, be entitled to have the condition reviewed by
the associate circuit judge or judge who imposed them. The
motion shall be determined promptly.
5. An associate circuit judge or judge ordering the
release of a person on any condition specified in this
section may at any time amend his order to impose additional
or different conditions of release; except that, if the
imposition of such additional or different conditions
results in the detention of the person as a result of his
inability to meet such conditions or in the release of the
person on a condition requiring him to return to custody
after specified hours, the provisions of subsection 4 of
this section shall apply.

SB 1785 4
6. Information stated in, or offered in connection
with, any order entered pursuant to this section need not
conform to the rules pertaining to the admissibility of
evidence in a court of law.
7. Nothing contained in this section shall be
construed to prevent the disposition of any case or class of
cases by forfeiture of collateral security where such
disposition is authorized by the court.
8. Persons charged with violations of municipal
ordinances may be released by a municipal judge or other
judge who hears and determines municipal ordinance violation
cases of the municipality involved under the same conditions
and in the same manner as provided in this section for
release by an associate circuit judge.
9. A circuit court may adopt a local rule authorizing
the pretrial release on electronic monitoring pursuant to
subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section in lieu of
incarceration of individuals charged with offenses
specifically identified therein.
100 10. Any bonding company or agent executing a bond
101 pursuant to any provision of this section shall collect
102 fifty percent of any bonding fee prior to executing any bond
103 where the defendant is charged with a felony offense that:
104 involves a victim, is a violation of chapter 571, is a
105 violation of 577.010, the defendant is a prior or persistent
106 offender, or is a misdemeanor case involving a victim,
107 resisting arrest, or aggravated fleeing and eluding, or in
108 any case where the defendant has previously been found
109 guilty of any of the above listed offenses.
110 11. The bonding agent shall certify to the court under
111 the penalty of perjury that they have received the required

SB 1785 5
112 percentage from the defendant. Such certification shall be
113 submitted to the court with all other bonding paperwork.
114 12. Failure to provide the required certification
115 shall be a class A misdemeanor for the first offense.
116 Falsification of paperwork shall be a class E felony. In
117 addition to any criminal charge by this section, the bonding
118 agent shall be disqualified from writing bail bonds for a
119 period of five years.
✓